Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 3 POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF DIRECTORS
§ 43-322A. Power to incur debts — Mitigation plans and recharge projects — Judicial examination.

The board may by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the board, determine that the interest of the district and the public interest and necessity demand the development and operation of a mitigation plan or recharge project and shall set forth the amount of obligation or contract indebtedness proposed to be issued by the district under the provisions of this chapter for the development of such mitigation plan or recharge project. The board shall submit the contract indebtedness in the proposed resolution to a vote of the qualified electors of the district as defined in section 43-111, Idaho Code, at an election to be held only if within fifteen (15) days after the passage of such resolution a referendum petition signed by qualified electors of the district whose aggregate water rights equal not less than ten percent (10%), calculated on a per acre basis, of the aggregate water rights of all qualified electors of the district, shall be filed with the secretary of the district requesting that an election upon the issuance of the contract indebtedness be held and conducted under the provisions of this section. Any election required to be held pursuant to a referendum petition filed in accordance with this section for the purpose of submitting any proposition or propositions of incurring such obligation or indebtedness shall be held in accordance with section 34-106, Idaho Code. The resolution, in addition to such declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the mitigation plan or recharge plan, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the sources of the revenues and assessments pledged to the payment of the indebtedness. The separate election upon the assessments shall be held at the same time as and shall be combined with any such election required to be held upon the indebtedness question pursuant to a referendum petition. If no referendum petition is filed, or if so filed, if it shall appear from the returns that the qualified electors of the district representing two-thirds (2/3) of the aggregate water rights of the district, calculated on a per acre basis, have voted in favor of the proposition, the district thereupon shall be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, or enter into such contracts, all for the purposes provided for in the proposition submitted in the resolution, and in the amount so provided subject to judicial examination as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent election or elections called for such purpose.

Prior to the incurring of indebtedness, the board of directors of the irrigation district shall file in the district court of the county in which their office is situated a petition, praying in effect that the proceedings aforesaid may be examined, approved and confirmed by the court. The petition shall state generally that the irrigation district was duly organized and the first board of directors elected, that due and lawful proceedings were taken to authorize the incurrence of indebtedness by the issuance of bonds or otherwise for mitigation plans or recharge projects in an amount to be stated, and that said assessment, list and apportionment were duly made and a copy of said assessment, list and apportionment shall be attached to said petition. Whenever any district that is required to file a petition hereunder has or proposes to enter into a contract or contracts with one (1) or more districts or ground water district, the boards of such other districts or ground water districts may join in the filing of such petition, and the district court in which such petition is filed shall have jurisdiction to hear the petition and to grant the relief prayed for therein. Each such petition shall pray for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred hereby or by any amendment hereto or of any assessment levied or of any apportionment of costs or of any act, proceeding or contract of the district or districts, whether or not said contracts shall have been executed, including, without limitation, proposed contracts for the reconstruction, rehabilitation, replacement and improvement of any well and other related structures and works and appurtenances, falling water contracts, contracts with other districts and contracts with other public and private persons, firms, corporations and associations associated with mitigation plans or recharge projects. Such petition shall set forth the facts whereon the validity of such powers, assessments, apportionments, acts, proceedings or contracts is founded. Notice of the filing of said petition shall be given by the clerk of the court in accordance with the requirements of section 43-407, Idaho Code, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any contract or contracts, therein mentioned, may be examined.

Any water user in any district joining in the petition or any other person interested in the contracts or proposed contracts may appear and answer the petition at any time prior to the date fixed for the hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court; and the petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail so to appear. The said petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction and, upon hearing, the court: shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted; shall examine all of the proceedings of all of the districts as set forth in the petition; shall hear all objections either filed in the proceeding or brought up from the hearings before any of the boards; shall correct all errors in the assessments and apportionments of costs; shall ratify, approve and confirm all apportionments of costs and assessments levied; shall make such findings with reference thereto and render a judgment and decree thereon approving and confirming all of the powers, assessments, apportionments, acts, proceedings and contracts of each of the districts as set forth in the petition as the case warrants. Costs may be divided or apportioned among the contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment of the court may be had as in other similar cases. The court shall disregard any error, irregularity or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

§ 43-323. Place of use.

A change in the generally described place of use for a water right held by an irrigation district may be made without applying for a change under the provisions of section 42-222, Idaho Code, provided the district files with the department of water resources a map portraying the changes to the generally described place of use within which the district’s water rights shall be exercised. For this filing requirement, it shall be sufficient to provide a drawing on a seven-and-one-half-minute (7-½) quadrangle map having a scale of one to twenty-four thousand (1:24,000) which shows the changes to the outer limits of the boundaries of the irrigation district to include each quarter-quarter section within which irrigation occurs. This map showing changes to the generally described place of use shall be filed with the department no later than April 1 of the year following the changes. Notwithstanding the filing of such map, only the legal description of an irrigation district’s boundaries recorded in compliance with title 43, Idaho Code, shall constitute conclusive proof of the district’s boundaries for purposes other than defining the generally described place of use for a water right held by the district.

§ 43-324. Statement of financial condition.

On or before the second Tuesday of February of each year the board of directors of each irrigation district organized under this title shall publish in at least one (1) issue of some newspaper published in the county or counties in which such district is situated, a full, true and correct statement of the financial condition of said district, at the end of the last preceding fiscal year, giving all liabilities and assets of the said district, in a form to be prescribed by the bureau of public accounts of the state of Idaho.

§ 43-325. County commissioners to have access to books.

Any board of directors of any such irrigation district, or the secretary thereof, shall at any time allow any member of the board of county commissioners, when acting under the order of such board, to have access to all books, records and vouchers of the district which are in possession or control of said board of directors or said secretary of said board.

§ 43-326. Power to maintain parks.

The board of directors of any irrigation district shall have the power to maintain public parks and recreation grounds for the benefit of the people of the district and may set aside for this purpose, land belonging to the district, including land acquired by the district from sale for delinquent water assessments. The district shall have the power to purchase land, or to acquire land by lease, within the district for public parks and recreation ground. In the maintenance of said grounds, the board of directors may construct buildings and provide facilities for recreation purposes and may receive gifts and donations of either real or personal property for the purposes hereinbefore enumerated.

§ 43-327. Delinquent assessments — Shutting off of water.

The board of directors of any irrigation district shall have the power to refuse to deliver water for the use on any lands upon which any assessments, tolls or charges levied, assessed or charged against said lands or the owner, lessee, occupant or contract purchaser thereof, under any section of this title, whether for irrigation or domestic water service, are unpaid for more than ninety (90) days after delinquency until such assessments, tolls or charges, together with any lawful penalties and additional charges are paid.

Provided, that, in irrigation districts having a contract with the United States under the provisions of this title, for the construction, or operation, or maintenance of a domestic water system or for the repayment to the United States of a loan for any such purpose, the board of directors of such district may, by resolution, from time to time, fix a date or dates after which any or all lawful tolls and/or charges of the district, including without limitation domestic water tolls and charges, and excepting only assessments provided for in this title against real property within the district, shall be deemed delinquent. Such district shall have the right, in addition to and supplemental to all other legal rights now in effect, or hereafter acquired for the collection of any such sums, to cease delivery of domestic and irrigation water to all lands in connection with which such tolls or charges have been incurred and, at the district’s option, also to all other lands within the district belonging to the person or persons, firm, corporation or other legal entity incurring any such tolls or charges. Such delivery may be ceased at any time after the tenth day following the date any such sums become delinquent, and until all such sums together with any lawful penalties, additional charges and/or interest at the legal rate are paid.

§ 43-328. Petition to construct improvements for irrigation — Assent of petitioners to assessment of cost of improvement.

The holders of title, or evidence of title, representing a majority of the acreage of any body of land within any irrigation district, may file with the board of directors of the district a petition in writing, praying for the construction of any improvement necessary or expedient for the efficient irrigation of the lands, including facilities for the recharge of ground water basins. The petition shall in a general way describe the proposed improvement and shall describe the tracts, or body of land, owned by the petitioners, and shall contain a description of the exterior boundaries of the land for which the proposed improvement is to be constructed, and describing therein any lands that are to be excepted from the benefit or use of the proposed improvement. The petition shall also contain an agreement on the part of the petitioners that the cost of construction of the improvement shall constitute a lien upon the lands within the exterior boundaries of the land described in the petition, except the lands that are therein excepted from the benefit or use of the proposed improvement, and that the lands shall be assessed for and pay the cost of the improvement. The petition shall be deemed to give assent of the petitioners to construction of the improvement and shall authorize the assessment of the cost of such improvement upon and against the lands described in the petition and not specifically therein excepted. The petition shall be acknowledged in the same manner that conveyances of land are required to be acknowledged.

§ 43-329. Elections to determine question as to construction of improvement — Resolution of directors.

The board of directors, if they deem it for the best interest of the district that the proposed improvement be constructed, may by resolution call an election to be held within the boundaries of the land described in the petition for the purpose of submitting the question as to whether or not the proposed improvement shall be constructed. The board shall in the resolution fix the time and place of holding the election, and specify the polling place, and shall also appoint three (3) judges who shall constitute a board of election. The resolution shall also contain the ballot title to be used at the election, which title shall contain such information as in the judgment of the board will advise the owners of the land to be charged with the cost of the proposed improvement as to the general nature of the improvement and the estimated cost.

The board at the time of calling the election within the land described in the petition shall also by resolution call an election to be held within the district at large for the purpose of submitting the question as to whether or not the proposed improvement shall be constructed. This resolution shall contain provisions identical with those provided for in subsection (1) of this section. The election in the district at large shall be held on the same day that the election within the territory described in the petition is held. The election shall be conducted, as nearly as practicable, in accordance with the general election laws of the state applicable to irrigation districts.

§ 43-330. Majority of votes as determinative — Construction of improvement — Cost — Apportionment — Assessment. — If a majority of the votes cast by the electors within the boundaries of the land described in the petition are “Improvement — Yes,” and if a majority of the votes cast by the electors in the district at large are “Improvement

Yes,” then, but not otherwise, the board shall construct the improvement. The cost of construction shall be apportioned by the board to the lands within the boundaries described in the petition, so that each acre of irrigable land therein shall be assessed and required to pay the same amount. In all other respects the assessment and its levy and collection shall be, as nearly as practicable, in accordance with the assessment, levy and collection of other assessments and taxes levied upon lands within the district.

§ 43-330A. Contracts with landowners for construction of improvements.

When a parcel of land lying within an irrigation district has been subdivided and the owner or owners of the entire parcel propose to develop that parcel or any of the tracts therein for residential, commercial, industrial or municipal use, the board of directors of the district may enter into a contract with the owner or owners of the entire parcel, or of any tract therein, for the construction of a pressurized system for the proper distribution of irrigation water to the parcel or to the designated tracts within the parcel.

§ 43-330B. Contract provisions.

Any contract entered into under the authority of section 43-330A, Idaho Code, shall include the following provisions:

An apportionment of the cost of the construction of the distribution system against the parcel or against the tract or tracts which are included in the contract;

The cost of construction of the distribution system shall constitute a lien against the parcel, tract or tracts included in the contract, to secure payment of any portion of the cost of construction that is not paid upon completion of construction by the owner or owners, or by a third party on their behalf, and securing payment of interest on any deferred installments of the construction costs;

A schedule of annual installment payments, with accrued interest, for the portion, if any, of the construction costs that are not paid upon completion of construction;

The annual installment payment against the parcel or against the tract or tracts included in the contract shall be included in the annual assessments levied by the district against the parcel, tract or tracts and any such assessment and its levy and collection shall be, as nearly as practicable, in accordance with the assessment, levy and collection of other assessments levied upon lands in the district;

The deferred annual installment payments of principal and accrued interest may be prepaid in whole or in part at any time without penalty, but any prepayment of principal shall not be less that [than] one-half (½) the amount of the annual installment payment of principal next coming due, but the prepayment privilege authorized in this subsection shall not be applicable where the construction costs have been financed through a local improvement district;

If the district has constructed or proposes to construct a pumping station and pipeline to serve the parcel, tract or tracts included in the contract and other lands, the cost of the pumping station and pipeline shall be apportioned by the board to all lands which are planned to be served by the pumping station, so that each acre of irrigable land to be served by the pumping station shall be assessed and required to pay the same amount;

A grant of an easement to the district for the installation, operation, maintenance, repair and replacement of the portion of the distribution system located on the parcel, tract or tracts included in the contract. The easement shall be of sufficient width to allow construction, installation, operation, maintenance, repair and replacement by the use of ordinary mechanized equipment designed to perform those functions.

§ 43-330C. Compliance.

If the contract provides for construction of any portion of the distribution system by the owner or owners, chapter 9, title 43, Idaho Code, shall not be applicable to that portion of the construction. If any portion of the distribution system is to be constructed by the district, the district shall comply with the provisions of chapter 9, title 43, Idaho Code, insofar as applicable to the construction to be performed by the district or by a contractor under a separate contract with the district, unless the owner or owners furnish a written waiver of such compliance.

§ 43-330D. Contract to be recorded.

Any contract entered into by an irrigation district under the authority of section 43-330A, Idaho Code, shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any portion of the land covered by the contract is located, and the owner or owners named in the contract shall remain personally liable, jointly and severally, for the cost of construction until the contract has been properly recorded.

§ 43-330E. District to own distribution system.

Any pressurized distribution system constructed under the authority of section 43-330A, Idaho Code, shall be the property of, and shall be owned by, the district.

§ 43-330F. Operation and maintenance of pressurized distribution systems.

Any pressurized distribution system constructed under the authority of section 43-330A, Idaho Code, shall be operated, maintained, repaired and replaced by the district, and the district may levy and collect an assessment against each tract of land served by the distribution system to defray the cost and expense of such operation, maintenance, repair or replacement. The board shall apportion to each tract of land included in the contract a portion of the cost of operation, maintenance, repair and replacement of the distribution system, on the same basis as the cost of construction of the distribution system is apportioned.

§ 43-330G. Distribution systems for land in more than one irrigation district — Joint contract — Division of management — Assessments.

Where the interests of two (2) or more irrigation districts and the interests of the contracting landowners will be served thereby, lands in two (2) or more irrigation districts may be included in a contract entered into by the districts and the landowners under the authority of section 43-330A, Idaho Code, and the contract shall specify how the ownership, management, operation, maintenance, repair and replacement of the distribution system shall be divided between or among the districts, and shall provide that all assessments for construction costs and for costs of operation, maintenance, repair and replacement against any tract of land included in the contract shall be levied and collected by the district in which that tract is located.

§ 43-331. Directors may construct or maintain improvements, levy assessments.

This section applies: (a) When a parcel of land lying within an irrigation district is subdivided and the owner has made no provisions which in the opinion of the board of directors is adequate for the proper distribution of water thereto; or (b) when improvements for the distribution or delivery of water to any tract of land are not owned by the district and the owner or person in control of the improvement fails to maintain, repair or replace the improvement as required for the proper and efficient distribution or delivery of water to any tract; or (c) when fifty percent (50%) or more of the owners of the tracts in any such subdivided parcel request that the board provide for the proper distribution of water thereto or request that the board maintain, repair or replace the improvement as required for the proper and efficient distribution or delivery of water to any tract.

Whenever the interest or convenience of such tracts requires the construction, repair or maintenance of any ditch, flume, dike, aqueduct or other improvement, the board may construct, repair or maintain such improvement, and levy and collect an assessment upon all tracts specially benefited thereby, to defray the whole or any portion of the cost and expense thereof. The board may determine what lands are specially benefited by such construction, repair or maintenance, and the amount to which each tract is benefited.

§ 43-332. Apportionment of water to tracts — Employment of person to distribute water — Assessment of cost — Lien on land.

Whenever a parcel of land lying within an irrigation district is subdivided and plats of such subdivision are filed as provided by law, and the owners fail to properly apportion the water to their various tracts in the subdivision, or upon request made by fifty percent (50%) or more of the owners of the tracts in the subdivision the board of directors may employ some competent person to distribute and apportion water for such tracts. The reasonable cost of such services shall be apportioned each year by the board to such tracts. The cost of such services shall be assessed by the board as a special charge to the tracts in the same manner as other assessments are made by the board. The assessment so levied and apportioned shall be a lien upon the tracts, and shall be collected in the same manner as all other assessments are levied and collected by the board.

§ 43-333. Resolution for water distribution works or services — Hearing of objections — Construction, repair or maintenance of improvement — Apportionment of costs — Assessment.

Whenever the board of directors shall deem it expedient or necessary to construct, repair or maintain ditches, flumes, dikes, aqueducts or other improvements as provided in section 43-331, Idaho Code, or to employ the services of some competent person to distribute and apportion water for any subdivision, as provided in section 43-332, Idaho Code, it shall declare such necessity by resolution.

A resolution shall be posted in three (3) public places in the subdivision for five (5) days. Within ten (10) days from the date when the resolution is posted, the owner of any property within the tract may file with the secretary a written remonstrance against the proposed improvement or employment. The board hearing such remonstrances may, in its discretion, overrule any remonstrance and by a resolution order construction, repair or maintenance of the improvements. The board may either enter into a contract to complete the improvement or, in its discretion, complete the improvement under its own supervision. After the work on the improvement is completed the board shall, by resolution, apportion the costs and shall declare an assessment upon each tract benefited, which assessments shall be final and conclusive.

§ 43-334. Procedure for levy and collection of special assessment — Appeal.

Whenever the board of directors levies a special assessment against the various tracts of land as provided in section 43-331 and section 43-332, Idaho Code, it shall be extended against the tracts of land in the same manner as other assessments are levied and extended upon the assessment rolls of the irrigation district or county. The assessments shall be collected in the same manner as other assessments are collected. An appeal may be taken from the action of the board to the district court of the county in which the land is situated. The appeal shall be taken, perfected and prosecuted in the same manner and within the same period of time as an appeal from the board of county commissioners.

§ 43-335. Leasing of water rights by irrigation district within the district by district’s where landowner can receive water through the district’s irrigation system.

Any irrigation district which has within its boundaries residential, commercial or industrial lands, or any combination of those lands, and which holds water rights for those lands, shall have the right to lease, to any municipality, municipal provider, public utility, domestic water users organization which furnishes water service to those lands, or to any other entity for the distribution of water to those lands for uses other than culinary purposes, those water rights which are held for any residential, commercial or industrial lands for which the owner has elected not to receive his proportionate share of the irrigation district’s water through the irrigation system of the district; provided, however, that no water right under which water is delivered through a community ditch shall be leased without the written consent of the ditch users who do not elect not to receive water from the district. For purposes of this chapter, the terms “municipality” and [“]municipal provider” shall be defined as provided in section 42-202B, Idaho Code; “culinary purposes” shall mean the use of water for direct human consumption, cooking, sanitary purposes, and other such uses. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as amending or affecting the laws of Idaho pertaining to the control and regulation of public utilities, municipal providers or water corporations.

§ 43-336. Notification of landowners regarding lease.

Whenever the board of directors of an irrigation district resolves to lease all or any portion of any water right or water rights as authorized by section 43-335, Idaho Code, the district shall notify its landowners, by such method as the board shall order, that (1) the district intends to lease the water right or water rights identified by priority date, quantity and source in the notice, (2) owners of residential, commercial or industrial lands for which the district holds water rights may elect not to receive water from the district for their lands, and (3) consent of other ditch owners who will continue receiving water is required for leasing water rights delivered through community ditches.

§ 43-337. Requirements of election for landowners.

The election under section 43-335, Idaho Code, not to receive water shall be made in writing and shall state:

The name and address of the landowner;

The legal description of the land as to which the election is made;

The date of the notification from the district pursuant to which the election is made;

That the owner elects not to receive water from the irrigation system of the district under the water right held for the land described in the notification of election;

That this landowner’s election not to receive water from the district shall remain in effect so long as the lease under section 43-335, Idaho Code, has not been terminated.

The written notification of election shall be signed by the landowner and shall be delivered to the district at its office. Signature by each surviving spouse shall be required for a valid election as to land which is community property.

§ 43-338. Leasing of water rights inside the district by an irrigation district where the landowner cannot receive water through the irrigation system.

An irrigation district shall have the right to lease, to any municipality, municipal provider, public utility or domestic water users organization which furnishes water service to lands lying within the district, or to any other entity providing water service for uses other than culinary purposes those water rights which the landowner does not receive through the irrigation system of the district because the landowner has no ditch, pipeline or other transmission facility for carrying water from the district’s system to his land.

§ 43-339. No levy against lands where water rights are leased.

After the effective date of a lease by which a water right or any portion thereof is leased by an irrigation district under the authority granted by section 43-335 or 43-338, Idaho Code, the district shall not levy tolls or assessments for any purpose against the lands for which that water right is held by the district, so long as the lease remains in effect, and any toll or assessment levied in violation of this section shall be void and of no effect whatsoever.

§ 43-340. Use of moneys received for leased water rights.

All payments of rent received by an irrigation district under a lease of water rights authorized by section 43-335 or 43-338, Idaho Code, shall belong to the district, and it shall not be obligated to reimburse electing landowners for any such rental payments, and such payments shall be deemed to have been received by the district in lieu of tolls or assessments which otherwise would have been levied against the lands for which landowners have elected not to receive water or against the lands to which water cannot be delivered.

§ 43-341. Effect on water rights by leasing.

Use of water under a lease authorized by this act shall not constitute abandonment, or be grounds for forfeiture, of the water right, and shall not be deemed a change in the place of use or in the nature of the use of the water. Any change in the point or points of diversion of water shall require approval of the director of the department of water resources as provided in section 42-222, Idaho Code, but the director shall not be required to determine whether a water right has been abandoned or forfeited, in whole or in part, before approving any change in the point of diversion.

§ 43-342. Landowner may not receive water from the district after agreeing to lease water rights.

After the effective date of any lease by an irrigation district under the authority granted by section 43-335, Idaho Code, no landowner who has elected not to receive water from the district and who owns land from which the water right has been leased and who has actual knowledge of the lease, shall use water from the community ditch, if any, by which water is carried from the district’s system to his land. Any landowner violating this section shall be liable for all costs reasonably incurred by the district in enforcing the provisions of this section.

§ 43-343. Authority to construct and operate ground water recharge project.

Any irrigation district heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of this state, having received and affirmatively acted upon a petition to construct a ground water recharge improvement project in the manner provided by sections 43-328, 43-329 and 43-330, Idaho Code, is authorized by section 42-234, Idaho Code, to file an application with the department of water resources to appropriate the unappropriated waters of the state for the purpose of recharging ground water basins within the district to aid in the efficient irrigation of district lands. Upon approval of the application for permit by the director of the department of water resources, the district shall proceed in the manner provided by the irrigation district laws of the state to construct and operate the recharge project. The construction and operation of the project shall be subject to such additional conditions and limitations as shall be imposed by the director of the department of water resources pursuant to sections 42-203A and 42-234, Idaho Code.